Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202643-2924
Applicability of act.

(1) The Parenting Act shall apply to proceedings or modifications in which parenting functions for a child are at issue:

(a) Under Chapter 42, including, but not limited to, proceedings or modification of orders for dissolution of marriage and child custody;

(b) Under sections 43-1401 to 43-1418; and

(c) In a dispute between parents of a child adopted by a second adult person under subdivision (1)(c) of section 43-101.

(2) The Parenting Act may apply to proceedings or modifications in which parenting functions for a child are at issue under Chapter 30 or 43.

(3) The Parenting Act shall also apply to subsequent modifications of bridge orders entered under section 43-246.02 by a separate juvenile court or county court sitting as a juvenile court and docketed in a district court.

(4) The Parenting Act does not apply in any action filed by a county attorney or authorized attorney pursuant to his or her duties under section 42-358, 43-512 to 43-512.18, or 43-1401 to 43-1418, the Income Withholding for Child Support Act, or the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act for purposes of the establishment of paternity and the establishment and enforcement of child and medical support or a bridge order entered under section 43-246.02 by a separate juvenile court or county court sitting as a juvenile court and docketed in a district court. A county attorney or authorized attorney shall not participate in the development of or court review of a parenting plan under the Parenting Act. If both parents are parties to a paternity or support action filed by a county attorney or authorized attorney, the parents may proceed with a parenting plan.

Laws 2007, LB554, § 5;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 57;

Laws 2017, LB180, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB70, § 15.
July 18, 2026
Income Withholding for Child Support Act, see section 43-1701.

Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, see section 42-701.

In a paternity case subject to the Parenting Act where neither party has requested joint custody, if the court determines that joint custody is, or may be, in the best interests of the child, the court shall give the parties notice and an opportunity to be heard by holding an evidentiary hearing on the issue of joint custody. State ex rel. Amanda M. v. Justin T., 279 Neb. 273, 777 N.W.2d 565 (2010).

The Parenting Act applied because the action was filed after January 1, 2008, and because parenting functions for a child were at issue. Citta v. Facka, 19 Neb. App. 736, 812 N.W.2d 917 (2012).